Alabama, session 2026rs, HB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
41 Section 1. Sections 30-3-150, 30-3-151, 30-3-152, and
42 30-3-153, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
43 follows:
44 "§30-3-150
45 Joint Custody. It is the policy of this state to assure
46 that minor children have frequent and continuing contact and
47 substantial parenting time with parents who have shown the
48 ability to act in the best interest of their children and to
49 encourage parents to share in the rights and responsibilities
50 of parenting and rearing their children after the parents have
51 separated or dissolved their marriage. Joint custody does not
52 necessarily mean equal physical custody."
53 "§30-3-151
54 For the purposes of this article the following words
55 shall have the following meanings:
56 (1) JOINT CUSTODY. Joint legal custody and joint
Page 2

(1) JOINT CUSTODY. Joint legal custody and joint
HB19 INTRODUCED
57 physical custody.
58 (2) JOINT LEGAL CUSTODY. A custody arrangement where
59 both Both parents have equal rights and responsibilities for
60 major decisions concerning the child, including, but not
61 limited to, the education of the child, health care, and
62 religious training of the child. The court may designate one
63 parent to have sole power to make certain decisions while both
64 parents retain equal rights and responsibilities for other
65 decisions.
66 (3) JOINT PHYSICAL CUSTODY. A custody arrangement where
67 physical Physical custody is shared by the parents in a way
68 that assures the child frequent and substantial contact with
69 each parent. Joint physical custody does not necessarily mean
70 physical custody of equal durations of time.
71 (4) SOLE LEGAL CUSTODY. A status of custody where one
72 One parent has sole rights and responsibilities to make major
73 decisions concerning the child, including, but not limited to,
74 the education of the child, health care, and religious
75 training of the child.
76 (5) SOLE PHYSICAL CUSTODY or PRIMARY PHYSICAL CUSTODY.
77 A status of custody where one One parent has sole physical
78 custody and the other parent has rights of visitation
79 parenting time with the child, except as otherwise provided by
80 the court."
81 "§30-3-152
82 (a) Except as provided in Section 30-3-131, in any
83 award of custody under the custodial designations in Section
84 30-3-151, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a
Page 3

30-3-151, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a
HB19 INTRODUCED
85 preponderance of the evidence, that: (i) joint legal custody
86 is in the best interest of the child; and (ii) the child shall
87 have frequent and continuing contact and substantial parenting
88 time with both parents. If the presumptions are not rebutted,
89 the court shall award joint legal custody, frequent and
90 continuing contact of the child with both parents, and
91 substantial parenting time with both parents.The court shall
92 in every case consider joint custody but may award any form of
93 custody which is determined to be in the best interest of the
94 child.
95 (b) In determining deciding whether to award joint
96 legal custody or joint custody,is in the best interest of the
97 child, the court shall consider the same factors considered in
98 awarding sole legal and physical custody any other custody
99 arrangement and all of the following factors:
100 (1) The agreement or lack of agreement of the parents
101 on joint custody.
102 (2) The past and present ability of the parents to
103 cooperate with each other and make decisions jointly.
104 (3) The ability of the parents to encourage the sharing
105 of love, affection, and contact between the child and the
106 other parent.
107 (4) Any history of or potential for child abuse, spouse
108 abuse, or kidnapping.
109 (5) The geographic proximity of the parents to each
110 other as this relates to the practical considerations of joint
111 physical custody.
112 (6) The emotional bond the child has with either or
Page 4

(6) The emotional bond the child has with either or
HB19 INTRODUCED
113 both of his or her parents.
114 (c)(b) The court may order a form of joint custody
115 without the consent of both parents, when it is in the best
116 interest of the child.
117 (c) (d) In any joint physical custody order that does
118 not designate a primary physical custodian, the court shall
119 designate the parent's residence which contains the school
120 zone of the child.
121 (e) If both parents request joint custody, the
122 presumption is that joint custody is in the best interest of
123 the child. Joint joint legal custody, frequent and continuing
124 contact, or substantial parenting time is not shall be granted
125 in the final order of the court court's final order, the court
126 shall make unless the court makes specific findings as to why
127 joint custody is not granted supporting its determination that
128 the presumption or presumptions of subsection (a) were
129 overcome."
130 "§30-3-153
131 In the final order of the court, the court shall
132 address all of the following matters:
133 (1) Parenting time for each parent during the school
134 year, the summer, holidays, birthdays of the child, birthdays
135 of the parents, Father's Day, and Mother's Day.
136 (2) Telephone communication between the parents and the
137 child.
138 (3) The access of both parents to medical records and
139 educational records of the child.
140 (4) The access of both parents to school activities and
Page 5

(4) The access of both parents to school activities and
HB19 INTRODUCED
141 extracurricular activities of the child.
142 (5) Communication between the parents about the child's
143 doctor appointments and other medical appointments.
144 (6) Child support and the maintenance of health
145 insurance for the child.(a) In order to implement joint
146 custody, the court shall require the parents to submit, as
147 part of their agreement, provisions covering matters relevant
148 to the care and custody of the child, including, but not
149 limited to, all of the following:
150 (1) The care and education of the child.
151 (2) The medical and dental care of the child.
152 (3) Holidays and vacations.
153 (4) Child support.
154 (5) Other necessary factors that affect the physical or
155 emotional health and well-being of the child.
156 (6) Designating the parent possessing primary authority
157 and responsibility regarding involvement of the minor child in
158 academic, religious, civic, cultural, athletic, and other
159 activities, and in medical and dental care if the parents are
160 unable to agree on these decisions. The exercise of this
161 primary authority is not intended to negate the responsibility
162 of the parties to notify and communicate with each other as
163 provided in this article.
164 (b) If the parties are unable to reach an agreement as
165 to the provisions in subsection (a), the court shall set the
166 plan."
167 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
168 1, 2026.
Page 6